South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4088.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Repeal SECTION 1.    Act 668 of 1934, as amended, is repealed. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________